North Dakota, session 69, HB1610.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 47-16 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Fee for accepting check or other instrument of payment prohibited.
A landlord may not charge a tenant a fee to accept cash, a check, or a money order for the
payment of rent or any other payment required by the landlord under a lease for real property.

H. B. NO. 1610 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1610.
House Vote: Yeas 78 Nays 3 Absent 13
Senate Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 0 Absent 3
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State